Massachusetts, session 194th, S839.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION __. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official
edition is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new sections:-
Section ___. In setting Medicaid rates for nursing homes licensed pursuant to section
seventy-one of chapter 111 of the general laws, the executive office of health and human services
shall annually adjust such payments with an inflation adjustment consistent with the annual
unadjusted Skilled Nursing Facility Market Basket Update, as established by the Centers for
Medicare & Medicaid Services in 42 C.F.R. § 413.337.
Section __. Nursing homes licensed pursuant to section seventy-one of chapter 111 of the
general laws must have sufficient nursing staff with the appropriate competencies and skills sets
to provide nursing and related services to assure resident safety and attain or maintain the highest
practicable physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being of each resident, as determined by
resident assessments and individual plans of care and considering the number, acuity and
of 2

diagnoses of the facility's resident population in accordance with the facility assessment required
at 42 CFR 483.70(e). For the purpose of setting Medicaid rates for nursing homes licensed
pursuant to section seventy-one of chapter 111 of the general laws, the executive office of health
and human services shall recognize its full share of the actual nursing costs of meeting this
requirement.
of 2